Washington statutes.
RCW 7.56.120

Action to recover forfeited property.

Whenever any property shall be forfeited to the state for its use, the legal title shall be deemed to be in the state from the time of the forfeiture, and an information may be filed by the prosecuting attorney in the superior court for the recovery of the property, alleging the ground on which the recovery is claimed, and like proceedings and judgment shall be had as in civil action for the recovery of the property.

[Code 1881 s 713; 1877 p 145 s 717; 1854 p 218 s 480; RRS s 1045.]

NOTES:

Escheats: Chapter 11.08 RCW.

Revised uniform unclaimed property act: Chapter 63.30 RCW.